pt-BR: Ferragens > Ferramentas > Ferramentas para fios e cabos: Cortadores de cabos; Ferramentas de crimpagem; Descascadores de fios
da: Isenkram > Redskaber > Håndværktøjer til ledninger og kabler: Kabelskærere; Krympeværktøjer; Kabelstrippere
sv: Metallprodukter > Verktyg > Handverktyg för kablar: Kabelkapare; Klämverktyg; Kabelskalare
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Utensili > Utensili per fili e cavi: Tagliacavi; Strumenti di crimpatura; Spellafili
hu: Hardver > Szerszámok > Drótos és kábeles kéziszerszámok: Kábelvágók; Krimpelő szerszámok; Dróteltávolítók
fi: Rakentaminen > Työkalut > Käsikäyttöiset johto- ja kaapelityökalut: Johtoleikkurit; Johtopihdit; Johdonkuorijat
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Nářadí a nástroje > Nástroje pro práci s dráty a kabely: Nůžky na kabely; Krimpovací nástroje; Kleště a nástroje pro odizolování drátů
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Εργαλεία > Εργαλεία χειρός για καλώδια & σύρματα: Κόπτες καλωδίων; Εργαλεία σύσφιξης; Απογυμνωτές καλωδίων
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 工具 > 电线/电缆工具: 电缆剪; 压接工具; 剥线钳
pt-PT: Equipamento > Ferramentas > Ferramentas manuais para fios e cabos: Cortadores de cabos; Alicate de engaste; Alicate de descarnar
ro-RO: Feronerie > Unelte > Unelte de mână pentru sârmă și cablu: Dispozitive de tăiat cabluri; Scule de sertizare; Mașini de dezizolat sârmă
fr: Quincaillerie > Outils > Outils pour câbles et fils: Coupe-câbles; Outils de sertissage; Pinces à dénuder
sk-SK: Náradie > Nástroje > Ručné náradie na vodiče a káble: Nožnice na káble; Krimpovacie nástroje; Odizolovacie kliešte
hr-HR: Željezarija > Alati > Ručni alati za žice i kabele: Rezači za kabele; Alati za krimpanje; Kliješta za skidanje izolacije
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Gereedschap > Draad- en kabelgereedschappen: Kabelsnijders; Krimpgereedschappen; Draadstrippers
bg-BG: Железария > Инструменти > Ръчни инструменти за жици и кабели: Резачки за кабели; Инструменти за кримпване; Клещи оголване на кабели
vi: Phần cứng > Công cụ > Dụng cụ cầm tay dây & cáp: Kìm cắt cáp; Kìm gấp mép; Kìm tách dây điện
zh-TW: 硬體 > 工具 > 手動纜線切割工具: 電纜剪; 壓接工具; 剝線鉗
pl: Sprzęt > Narzędzia > Przewodowe narzędzia ręczne: Przecinaki do kabli; Narzędzia do zaciskania; Ściągacze drutu
de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Werkzeuge > Handwerkzeuge für Drähte und Kabel: Kabelschneider; Crimp-Werkzeuge; Abisolierzangen
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Įrankiai > Rankiniai įrankiai laidams ir kabeliams: Kabelių žirklės; Suspaudimo įrankiai; Izoliacijos nuėmikliai
ko: 철물 > 도구 > 전선/케이블 수공구: 케이블 절단기; 압착기; 전선 탈피기
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Orodja > Ročno orodje za žice in kable: Rezalniki kablov; Orodja za stiskanje; Klešče za odstranjevanje izolacije
ja: DIY用品 > 工具 > ワイヤー・ケーブル関連工具: ケーブルカッター; 圧着工具; ワイヤーストリッパー
nb: Maskinvare > Verktøy > Håndverktøy for ledninger og kabler: Kabelkuttere; Krympeverktøy; Ledningsstrippere
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > เครื่องมือ > เครื่องมือตัดสายไฟและสายเคเบิล: เครื่องตัดสายเคเบิล; คีมย้ำหางปลา; เครื่องปอกสายไฟ
tr: Hırdavat > Aletler > Tel ve Kablo El Aletleri: Kablo Kesiciler; Sıkma Aletleri; Kablo Sıyırıcılar
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Инструменты > Ручные инструменты для работы с проводами и кабелями: Инструменты для резки кабелей; Инструменты для опрессовки; Инструменты для снятия изоляции
es: Bricolaje > Herramientas > Herramientas para cables y alambres: Cortadores de cables; Herramientas de prensado; Pelacables
en: Hardware > Tools > Wire & Cable Hand Tools: Cable Cutters; Crimping Tools; Wire Strippers